src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexd
## Adjectives
#  ----------
## Adjectives in the Hiligaynon language describe things.

LEXICON Adj_Root
ayo # "good"
lipay # "happy"
subo # "sad"
akig # "angry"
dasig # "fast"
hinay # "slow"
dako # "big"
gamay # "small"
damo # "many"
diutay # "few"
tuod # "true"

LEXICON Adj_Uninflected
tanan # "all"
iban # "other"
pareho # "same, similar"
parehas # "same, similar"

LEXICON Adj_Tag
+A:0 #
